Arkansas, session 2025, SB138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-5-501 is amended to read as follows:
6-5-501. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Revolutionary War” means the insurrection of the thirteen
(13) original American colonies that led to the formation of the United
States of America and lasted from 1775-1783;
(2) “Civil War” means the 1861-1865 American Civil War;
(3) “Civil War-era weapon” means an instrument used in offensive
or defensive combat during the Civil War or a modern reproduction;
(4) “Civil War reenactor” means a member of an organized group
acting out historical events from the Civil War and carrying an actual weapon
from that era or a reproduction;
(5)(3) “French and Indian War” means the portion of the war
*CEB062*
01/28/2025 9:25:02 AM CEB062

SB138
between France and Great Britain that took place in what is now the United
States of America from 1754-1763;
(4) “Mexican-American War” means the war between the United
States and Mexico from 1846-1848;
(5) “School official” means a public school district
superintendent or principal, a private school superintendent or principal, a
president, chancellor, or dean of a publicly supported institution of higher
education, or a president or dean of a private institution of higher
education; and
(6) “School property” means any building, bus, campus, ground,
recreational area, athletic field, or other area or structure owned or in the
charge of a public school district, a private school, a publicly supported
institution of higher education, or a private institution of higher
education.;
(7) “War of 1812” means the conflict between the United States
and Great Britain from 1812-1815;
(8) “War reenactor” means a member of an organized group acting
out historical events from a war defined in this section and carrying an
actual weapon from that era or a reproduction of a weapon from that era; and
(9) “War-era weapon” means an instrument used in offensive or
defensive combat during a war defined in this section or a modern
reproduction of such an instrument.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-5-502 is amended to read as follows:
6-5-502. Weapons.
(a) A person in this state who is a Civil War war reenactor as defined
in § 6-5-501 may carry a Civil War war-era weapon on school property for
educational purposes so long as a school official grants approval in advance
and, if the weapon is a firearm, the firearm is unloaded.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section applies to the following wars:
(1) The Revolutionary War;
(2) The Civil War;
(3) The French and Indian War;
(4) The Mexican-American War; and
(5) The War of 1812.

01/28/2025 9:25:02 AM CEB062